District of Columbia statutes.
25-408

Application for a tasting permit for a class A licensee.

The application for issuance or renewal of a tasting permit for off-premises retailer’s license, class A, shall include:

(1)

A copy of the applicant’s off-premises’s retailers license, class A;

(2)

Drawings of the premises indicating the areas where sampling is to occur; and

(3)

The hours and days during which the tasting is to occur.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959